Florida, session 2026, SB672.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 15 16 Section 1.âSection 457.102, Florida Statutes, is reordered 17 and amended to read: 18 457.102âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter: 19 (1)ââAcupunctureâ means a form of primary health care, 20 based on traditional Chinese medical concepts and modern Eastern 21 oriental medical techniques, which that employs acupuncture 22 diagnosis and treatment, as well as adjunctive therapies and 23 diagnostic techniques, for the promotion, maintenance, and 24 restoration of health and the prevention of disease. Acupuncture 25 includes shall include, but is not be limited to, the insertion 26 of acupuncture needles and the application of moxibustion to 27 specific areas of the human body and the use of 28 electroacupuncture, Qi Gong, Eastern oriental massage, herbal 29 therapy, dietary guidelines, and other adjunctive therapies, as 30 defined by board rule. 31 (2)ââAcupuncturistâ means any person licensed as provided 32 in this chapter to practice acupuncture as a primary health care 33 provider. 34 (3)ââBoardâ means the Board of Acupuncture. 35 (7)(4)ââLicenseâ means the document of authorization issued 36 by the department for a person to engage in the practice of 37 acupuncture. 38 (4)(5)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of Health. 39 (5)ââDirect supervisionâ means the immediate onsite 40 supervision of other Florida-licensed health care practitioners 41 where the acupuncturist individually or collectively assumes 42 legal liability for the supervised actions. 43 (6)ââEastern Oriental medicineâ means a practice that 44 employs assessment, health history, physical examination, the 45 use of acupuncture diagnosis and diagnostic techniques, 46 electroacupuncture, Qi Gong, Eastern oriental massage, herbal 47 therapy, dietary guidelines, acupoint injection, and other 48 adjunctive therapies. 49 (8)ââPractice of acupunctureâ means to provide services 50 that apply traditional Chinese medical concepts, anatomy and 51 physiology, and modern Eastern medical techniques using 52 acupuncture and Eastern medicine, and the exercise of 53 prescriptive rights as provided under subsection (9) to identify 54 and evaluate and manage abnormal conditions, for the promotion, 55 maintenance, and restoration of health. The practice of 56 acupuncture includes stimulation of points, areas of the body, 57 and tissues using needles and devices. 58 (9)(7)ââPrescriptive rightsâ means the prescription, 59 administration, and use of needles and devices, restricted 60 devices, and prescription devices, and the recommendation for or 61 ordering of, or administration of herbs, homeopathics, and other 62 nutritional supplements in sterile form that are used in the 63 practice of acupuncture and Eastern oriental medicine unless 64 otherwise prohibited by state or federal law or regulation. For 65 the purposes of this subsection, herbs, homeopathics, and other 66 nutritional supplements in sterile form include vitamins, 67 minerals, lipids, sugars, carbohydrates, and amino acids. The 68 term does not include ophthalmic or oral inhalation drugs in 69 aqueous format, corticosteroids, antibiotics, vaccinations, 70 botulinum toxin, controlled substances as defined in s. 893.02, 71 medicinal drugs as defined in s. 465.003, or other medications 72 not used for the practice of acupuncture. 73 Section 2.âParagraphs (b), (c), and (d) of subsection (2) 74 of section 457.105, Florida Statutes, are amended, and paragraph 75 (f) is added to that subsection, to read: 76 457.105âLicensure qualifications and fees.â 77 (2)âA person may become licensed to practice acupuncture if 78 the person applies to the department and meets all of the 79 following criteria: 80 (b)âHas completed 60 college credits from an accredited 81 postsecondary institution as a prerequisite to enrollment in an 82 authorized 3-year course of study in acupuncture and oriental 83 medicine, and has completed a 3-year course of study in 84 acupuncture and oriental medicine, and effective July 31, 2001, 85 a 4-year course of study in acupuncture and Eastern oriental 86 medicine, which meets standards established by the board by 87 rule, including which standards include, but are not limited to, 88 successful completion of academic courses in Western anatomy, 89 Western physiology, Western pathology, Western biomedical 90 terminology, first aid, and cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR), 91 and 60 hours of study in injection therapy. However, any person 92 who enrolled in an authorized course of study in acupuncture 93 before August 1, 1997, must have completed only a 2-year course 94 of study which meets standards established by the board by rule, 95 which standards must include, but are not limited to, successful 96 completion of academic courses in western anatomy, western 97 physiology, and western pathology. 98 (c)âHas successfully completed a board-approved national 99 examination and certification process or, meets the requirements 100 for licensure by endorsement under s. 456.0145, or passes an 101 examination administered by the department, which examination 102 tests the applicantâs competency and knowledge of the practice 103 of acupuncture and oriental medicine. At the request of any 104 applicant, traditional oriental nomenclature for the points must 105 be used in the examination. The examination must include a 106 practical examination of the knowledge and skills required to 107 practice modern and traditional acupuncture and Eastern oriental 108 medicine, covering diagnostic and treatment techniques and 109 procedures. 110 (d)âPays the required fees set by the board by rule not to 111 exceed the following amounts: 112 1.âExamination fee: $500 plus the actual per applicant cost 113 to the department for purchase of the written and practical 114 portions of the examination from a national organization 115 approved by the board. 116 2.âApplication fee: $300. 117 3.âReexamination fee: $500 plus the actual per applicant 118 cost to the department for purchase of the written and practical 119 portions of the examination from a national organization 120 approved by the board. 121 2.4.âInitial biennial licensure fee: $400, if licensed in 122 the first half of the biennium, and $200, if licensed in the 123 second half of the biennium. 124 (f)âThis subsection does not prohibit an acupuncturist 125 licensed in another state, the District of Columbia, or a 126 possession or territory of the United States from performing 127 acupuncture procedures or demonstrating equipment or supplies 128 for educational purposes at a board-approved continuing 129 education program. 130 Section 3.âSubsection (3) of section 457.107, Florida 131 Statutes, is amended to read: 132 457.107âRenewal of licenses; continuing education.â 133 (3)âThe board shall prescribe by rule continuing education 134 requirements of up to 30 hours biennially as a condition for 135 renewal of a license. All education programs must be approved by 136 the board and that contribute to the advancement, extension, or 137 enhancement of professional skills and knowledge related to the 138 practice of acupuncture, whether conducted by a nonprofit or 139 profitmaking entity, are eligible for approval. The continuing 140 professional education requirements must be in acupuncture or 141 Eastern oriental medicine subjects, including, but not limited 142 to, anatomy, biological sciences, adjunctive therapies, 143 sanitation and sterilization, emergency protocols, and diseases, 144 or practice management. The board may set a fee of up to $100 145 for each continuing education provider. The licensee shall 146 retain in his or her records the certificates of completion of 147 continuing professional education requirements. All national and 148 state acupuncture and Eastern oriental medicine organizations 149 and acupuncture and Eastern oriental medicine schools are 150 approved to provide continuing professional education in 151 accordance with this subsection. 152 Section 4.âSection 457.1085, Florida Statutes, is amended 153 to read: 154 457.1085âInfection control.âPrior to November 1, 1986, The 155 board shall adopt rules relating to the prevention of infection, 156 the safe disposal of any potentially infectious materials, and 157 other requirements to protect the health, safety, and welfare of 158 the public. Beginning October 1, 1997, All acupuncture needles 159 that are to be used on a patient must be sterile and disposable, 160 and each needle may be used only once. 161 Section 5.âSubsection (1) of section 457.116, Florida 162 Statutes, is amended to read: 163 457.116âProhibited acts; penalty.â 164 (1)âA person may not: 165 (a)âPractice acupuncture unless the person is licensed 166 under ss. 457.101-457.118; 167 (b)âUse, in connection with his or her name or place of 168 business, any title or description of services which 169 incorporates the words âacupuncture,â âacupuncturist,â 170 âcertified acupuncturist,â âlicensed acupuncturist,â âEastern 171 oriental medical practitionerâ; the letters âL.Ac.,â âR.Ac.,â 172 âA.P.,â or âD.O.M.â; or any other words, letters, abbreviations, 173 or insignia indicating or implying that he or she practices 174 acupuncture unless he or she is a holder of a valid license 175 issued pursuant to ss. 457.101-457.118; 176 (c)âPresent as his or her own the license of another; 177 (d)âKnowingly give false or forged evidence to the board or 178 a member thereof; 179 (e)âUse or attempt to use a license that has been 180 suspended, revoked, or placed on inactive or delinquent status; 181 (f)âEmploy any person who is not licensed pursuant to ss. 182 457.101-457.118 to engage in the practice of acupuncture; or 183 (g)âConceal information relating to any violation of ss. 184 457.101-457.118. 185 Section 6.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.